District of Columbia statutes.
19-604.05

Transfer on death deed authorized.

An individual may transfer property to one or more beneficiaries effective at the transferor’s death by a transfer on death deed.

Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-230, § 2(b), 59 DCR 13606

History